District of Columbia statutes.
22-4515

Penalties.

Any violation of any provision of this chapter for which no penalty is specifically provided shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both.

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 654, ch. 465, § 15
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 240(c), 60 DCR 2064

History

This section is referenced in § 22-4504 and § 22-4514.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 22-3215.
1973 Ed., § 22-3215.

Prior Codifications

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(b) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(b) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 240(c) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes